Washington statutes.
RCW 43.42.902

Authority of participating permit agency retained.

This chapter shall not be construed to limit or abridge the powers and duties granted to a participating permit agency under the law that authorizes or requires the agency to issue a permit for a project. Each participating permit agency shall retain its authority to make all decisions on all nonprocedural matters with regard to the respective component permit that is within its scope of its responsibility including, but not limited to, the determination of permit application completeness, permit approval or approval with conditions, or permit denial. The office may not substitute its judgment for that of a participating permit agency on any such nonprocedural matters.

[ 2009 c 97 s 13.]